Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6902
Performance of
abortion; notarized written consent required.

Except in the case of a medical emergency
or except as provided in sections 71-6902.01, 71-6903, and 71-6906, no person
shall perform an abortion upon a pregnant woman unless, in the case of a woman
who is less than eighteen years of age, he or she first obtains the notarized
written consent of both the pregnant woman and one of her parents or a legal
guardian or, in the case of a woman for whom a guardian has been appointed
pursuant to sections 30-2617 to 30-2629, he or she first obtains the notarized
written consent of her guardian. In deciding whether to grant such consent,
a pregnant woman's parent or guardian shall consider only his or her child's
or ward's best interest.

Laws 1991, LB 425, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB690, § 4.